Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Differential treatment or benefits" means:
(a) Differential, preferential, or prejudicial treatment or consideration; or
(b) To confer or withhold a benefit;
(2) "Discriminatory concepts" means concepts justifying or promoting differential
treatment or benefits conferred to individuals on the basis of religion, race, sex,
color, or national origin, but does not include differential treatment or benefits
excluded from diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives under subsection (3)(b)
of this section;
(3) (a) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative" means:
1. A policy, practice, or procedure designed or implemented to promote
or provide differential treatment or benefits to individuals on the basis
of religion, race, sex, color, or national origin, including but not
limited to any such policy, practice, or procedure related to
employment, employee recruitment, employee hiring, contracts,
contract renewal, government policy, or employee discipline;
2. A policy, practice, or procedure promoting gender nonconformity or
disparaging heterosexuality and heteronormativity; or
3. A training, conference, presentation, meeting, or professional
development containing, implementing, or promoting discriminatory
concepts.
(b) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative" does not include any federal
mandate;
Page 1 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(4) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion office" means an office, division, or other unit
of a state or local government that:
(a) Is responsible for developing, implementing, or promoting discriminatory
concepts or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives, regardless of whether
the office is designated as a diversity, equity, and inclusion office; and
(b) Is not expressly required pursuant to a federal mandate;
(5) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion officer" means an employee, contractor, or
volunteer:
(a) Whose responsibilities include developing, implementing, or promoting
discriminatory concepts or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives,
regardless of whether the position is designated as a diversity, equity, and
inclusion position or affiliated with a diversity, equity, and inclusion office;
and
(b) Who serves in a role that is not expressly required pursuant to a federal
mandate;
(6) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion training" means a training, conference,
presentation, meeting, or professional development that:
(a) Contains, implements, or promotes discriminatory concepts or diversity,
equity, and inclusion initiatives; and
(b) Is not expressly required pursuant to a federal mandate;
(7) "Federal mandate" means a policy, program, training, activity, or procedure that
is:
(a) Designated or implemented to promote or justify discriminatory concepts or
promote or provide differential treatment or benefits to individuals on the
basis of religion, race, sex, color, or national origin; and
(b) Required pursuant to a court order, a binding contract entered into prior to
the effective date of this Act, or any applicable federal law, including but
Page 2 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
not limited to:
1. The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et
seq., as amended;
2. The Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, 29 U.S.C. sec.
621 et seq., as amended; and
3. The federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, as amended;
(8) "Public agency" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.870;
(9) "Qualified individual" means any of the following:
(a) An individual who is employed by a state or local government;
(b) A candidate or applicant for employment with a state or local government;
and
(c) Any entity denied a contract, transaction, or other financial opportunity
with a state or local government based upon the religion, race, sex, color, or
national origin of the ownership, management, or staff of the entity;
(10) "Resource" means:
(a) Moneys appropriated by the General Assembly;
(b) Moneys or items of value derived from bequests, charges, deposits,
donations, endowments, fees, grants, gifts, income, receipts, or any other
source;
(c) Facilities, materials, and other physical resources;
(d) Digital resources, including any official website or social media account of
a public agency; and
(e) Classified and unclassified employees, volunteers, and other human
resources; and
(11) "State or local government" means:
(a) The executive branch of state government;
(b) The judicial branch of state government;
Page 3 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(c) The legislative branch of state government; and
(d) Any:
1. City government;
2. County government;
3. Urban-county government;
4. Charter county government;
5. Consolidated local government; and
6. Unified local government.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A state or local government shall not do any of the following:
(a) Provide any differential treatment or benefits to an individual, including an
applicant for employment, promotion, or contract renewal, on the basis of
the individual's religion, race, sex, color, or national origin;
(b) Prioritize or provide preferential consideration for vendors, contracts, or
other transactions based upon the religion, race, sex, color, or national
origin of the ownership, management, or staff of any business or nonprofit
entity, except that a state or local government may provide preferential
consideration for businesses owned by residents of Kentucky and the United
States;
(c) On an application for employment, promotion, contract renewal, or other
employment benefit, solicit any pledge or statement on the applicant's
experience with or views on religion, race, sex, color, or national origin; or
(d) Require or incentivize an individual to attend diversity, equity, and
inclusion training or provide any differential treatment or benefits to an
individual based on the individual's participation in diversity, equity, and
inclusion training.
Page 4 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(2) A public agency shall not expend or utilize any resources to:
(a) Establish or maintain a diversity, equity, and inclusion office;
(b) Contract for or employ an individual to serve as a diversity, equity, and
inclusion officer;
(c) Provide diversity, equity, and inclusion training or contribute to any cost
associated with planning, promoting, hosting, traveling to, attending,
presenting, or otherwise participating in diversity, equity, and inclusion
training;
(d) Establish or maintain diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives;
(e) Promote or justify discriminatory concepts; or
(f) Purchase, promote, or distribute any content or materials that promote or
justify discriminatory concepts or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives.
(3) Compliance with a federal mandate shall be narrowly tailored to the express,
enforceable provisions thereof.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Any person may notify the Attorney General of a violation or alleged
violation of Section 2 of this Act.
(b) The Attorney General may bring civil action for a writ of mandamus to
compel a state or local government or public agency to comply with Section
2 of this Act or subsection (3) of this section.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a qualified individual may
bring a civil action for injunctive relief from a violation of Section 2 of this
Act or subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity are waived for the limited
purpose of bringing a claim filed under this subsection and arising from a
violation of Section 2 of this Act or subsection (3) of this section.
Page 5 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(c) A qualified individual may recover reasonable and actual attorney's fees
and litigation costs upon proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that a
defendant intentionally and willfully violated Section 2 of this Act or
subsection (3) of this section.
(d) The remedies identified in this subsection shall be in addition to and not in
lieu of any other remedies available at law or equity.
(3) An employee or agent of a state or local government or public agency shall not
use, or threaten the use of, any official authority or influence to discourage,
interfere with, or otherwise retaliate against any individual who in good faith
files, supports, aids, or otherwise participates in a civil action filed in accordance
with subsection (2) of this section.
Section 4. KRS 12.020 (Effective until July 1, 2025) is amended to read as
follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major
administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended
that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board,
bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any
other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program
cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily
authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the
attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and
coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions,
personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative
body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
Page 6 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
Page 7 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
Page 8 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
Page 9 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Charitable Gaming Legal Division.
c. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
d. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
e. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
f. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
(e) Department of Charitable Gaming.
Page 10 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
1. Division of Licensing and Compliance.
2. Division of Enforcement.
(f) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(g) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(h) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
(i) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
Page 11 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division –
Central and East Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
Page 12 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
Page 13 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Income Support.
(h) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
Page 14 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
Page 15 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
Page 16 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Employee[Diversity, Equality, and] Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
Page 17 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
Page 18 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
3. Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and
Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
Page 19 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(x) Disability Determination Services Program.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Department of Military Affairs.
(3) Department for Local Government.
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women.
(6) Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(7) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(8) Office of Minority Empowerment.
(9) Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
Page 20 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(10) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 5. KRS 12.020 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major
administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended
that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board,
bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any
other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program
cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily
authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the
attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and
coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions,
personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative
body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
Page 21 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
Page 22 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
Page 23 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
c. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
d. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
Page 24 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
e. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
(e) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(f) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(g) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
Page 25 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
(h) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
Page 26 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division –
Central and East Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
Page 27 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
Page 28 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
Page 29 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
Page 30 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
Page 31 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Employee[Diversity, Equality, and] Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
Page 32 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
3. Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
Page 33 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and
Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
Page 34 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
(x) Disability Determination Services Program.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Department of Military Affairs.
(3) Department for Local Government.
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women.
(6) Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(7) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(8) Office of Minority Empowerment.
(9) Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(10) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 6. KRS 18A.025 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Governor shall appoint the secretary of personnel as provided in KRS 18A.015,
who shall be considered an employee of the state. The secretary shall be a graduate
of an accredited college or university and have at least five (5) years' experience in
personnel administration or in related fields, have known sympathies with the merit
principle in government, and shall be dedicated to the preservation of this principle.
Additional education may be substituted for the required experience and additional
experience may be substituted for the required education.
(2) The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet or the secretary's designee shall be
responsible for the coordination of the state's affirmative action plan established by
KRS 18A.138.
(3) There is established within the Personnel Cabinet the following offices,
departments, and divisions, each of which shall be headed by either a
commissioner, executive director, or division director appointed by the secretary,
subject to the prior approval of the Governor pursuant to KRS 12.040 or 12.050,
Page 35 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
depending on the level of the appointment, except that the Kentucky Employees
Deferred Compensation Authority shall be headed by an executive director who
shall be appointed by the authority's board of directors:
(a) Office of the Secretary, which shall be responsible for communication with
state employees about personnel and other relevant issues and for the
administration and coordination of the following:
1. Office of Employee Relations, composed of the following programs:
a. Workers' Compensation Program pursuant to KRS 18A.375;
b. Sick leave Sharing Program, pursuant to KRS 18A.197;
c. Annual Leave Sharing Program, pursuant to KRS 18A.203;
d. Health and Safety Program;
e. Employee Assistance Program;
f. Employee Incentive Programs, pursuant to KRS 18A.202;
g. Employee Mediation Program; and
h. Living Organ Donor Leave Program, pursuant to KRS 18A.194;
2. Office of Administrative Services, which shall be responsible for the
Personnel Cabinet's administrative functions, composed of the following
programs:
a. Division of Technology Services;
b. Division of Human Resources; and
c. Division of Financial Services;
3. Office of Legal Services, which shall provide legal services to the
Personnel Cabinet and to executive branch agencies and their
representatives upon request;
4. Office of Employee[Diversity, Equality, and] Training, which shall
coordinate and implement[ diversity initiatives for state agencies,] the
affirmative action plan established by KRS 18A.138[,] and the state
Page 36 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
Equal Employment Opportunity Program[, and the Minority
Management Trainee Program];
5. Governmental Services Center, which shall be responsible for employee
and managerial training and organizational development;
6. Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority, which
shall maintain a deferred compensation plan for state employees; and
7. Office of Public Affairs, which shall assist in all aspects of developing
and executing the strategic direction of the cabinet;
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration, which shall be composed of
the:
1. Division of Employee Management, which shall be responsible for
payroll, records, classification, and compensation. The division shall
also be responsible for implementing layoff plans mandated by KRS
18A.113 and shall monitor and assist state agencies in complying with
the provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act. The division
shall:
a. Maintain the central personnel files mandated by KRS 18A.020
and process personnel documents and position actions;
b. Operate and maintain a uniform payroll system and certify
payrolls as required by KRS 18A.125;
c. Maintain plans of classification and compensation for state service
and review and evaluate the plans; and
d. Coordinate and implement the employee performance evaluation
systems throughout state government; and
2. Division of Career Opportunities, which shall be responsible for
employment counseling, applicant processing, employment register, and
staffing analysis functions. The division shall:
Page 37 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1275
a. Operate a centralized applicant and employee counseling program;
b. Operate, coordinate, and construct the examination program for
state employment;
c. Prepare registers of candidate employment; and
d. Coordinate outreach programs, such as recruitment and the
Administrative Intern Program; and
(c) Department of Employee Insurance, which shall be responsible for the:
1. Health Insurance Program, pursuant to KRS 18A.225;
2. Flexible Benefit Plan, pursuant to KRS 18A.227;
3. Division of Insurance Administration, which shall be responsible for
enrollment and service functions;
4. Division of Financial and Data Services, which shall be responsible for
fiscal and data analysis functions; and
5. Life Insurance Program pursuant to KRS 18A.205 to 18A.220.
(4) The cabinet shall include principal assistants appointed by the secretary, pursuant to
KRS 12.050 or 18A.115(1)(g) and (h), as necessary for the development and
implementation of policy. The secretary may employ, pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter, personnel necessary to execute the functions and duties of the
department.
Section 7. Whereas the General Assembly is committed to honoring the
constitutional promise of equal protection under the law, regardless of color, creed, race,
ethnicity, sex, age, marital status, familial status, disability, religion, and national origin,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act take effect upon its passage and approval
by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 38 of 38
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed